fixer/src/main/resources/la/la/universal/la.aff
SFX F Y 743
SFX F ero     ero             ero      
SFX F ero     eroque          ero      
SFX F ero     eroqve          ero      
SFX F ero     erone           ero      
SFX F ero     erove           ero      
SFX F ero     eroue           ero        
SFX F ero     ers             ero      
SFX F ero     ersque          ero      
SFX F ero     ersqve          ero      
SFX F ero     ersne           ero      
SFX F ero     ersve           ero      
SFX F ero     ersue           ero        
SFX F ero     ert             ero      
SFX F ero     ertque          ero      
SFX F ero     ertqve          ero      
SFX F ero     ertne           ero      
SFX F ero     ertve           ero      
SFX F ero     ertue           ero        
SFX F ero     erimus          ero      
SFX F ero     erimvs          ero      
SFX F ero     erimusque       ero      
SFX F ero     erimvsqve       ero      
SFX F ero     erimusne        ero      
SFX F ero     erimvsne        ero      
SFX F ero     erimusve        ero      
SFX F ero     erimusue        ero        
SFX F ero     erimvsve        ero      
SFX F ero     ertis           ero      
SFX F ero     ertisque        ero      
SFX F ero     ertisqve        ero      
SFX F ero     ertisne         ero      
SFX F ero     ertisve         ero      
SFX F ero     ertisue         ero        
SFX F ero     erunt           ero      
SFX F ero     ervnt           ero      
SFX F ero     eruntque        ero      
SFX F ero     ervntqve        ero      
SFX F ero     eruntne         ero      
SFX F ero     ervntne         ero      
SFX F ero     eruntve         ero      
SFX F ero     eruntue         ero        
SFX F ero     ervntve         ero      
SFX F ero     eror            ero      
SFX F ero     erorque         ero      
SFX F ero     erorqve         ero      
SFX F ero     erorne          ero      
SFX F ero     erorve          ero      
SFX F ero     erorue          ero        
SFX F ero     erris           ero      
SFX F ero     errisque        ero      
SFX F ero     errisqve        ero      
SFX F ero     errisne         ero      
SFX F ero     errisve         ero      
SFX F ero     errisue         ero        
SFX F ero     ertur           ero      
SFX F ero     ertvr           ero      
SFX F ero     erturque        ero      
SFX F ero     ertvrqve        ero      
SFX F ero     erturne         ero      
SFX F ero     ertvrne         ero      
SFX F ero     erturve         ero      
SFX F ero     erturue         ero        
SFX F ero     ertvrve         ero      
SFX F ero     erimur          ero      
SFX F ero     erimvr          ero      
SFX F ero     erimurque       ero      
SFX F ero     erimvrqve       ero      
SFX F ero     erimurne        ero      
SFX F ero     erimvrne        ero      
SFX F ero     erimurve        ero      
SFX F ero     erimurue        ero        
SFX F ero     erimvrve        ero      
SFX F ero     erimini         ero      
SFX F ero     eriminique      ero      
SFX F ero     eriminiqve      ero      
SFX F ero     eriminine       ero      
SFX F ero     eriminive       ero      
SFX F ero     eriminiue       ero        
SFX F ero     eruntur         ero      
SFX F ero     ervntvr         ero      
SFX F ero     erunturque      ero      
SFX F ero     ervntvrqve      ero      
SFX F ero     erunturne       ero      
SFX F ero     ervntvrne       ero      
SFX F ero     erunturve       ero      
SFX F ero     erunturue       ero        
SFX F ero     ervntvrve       ero      
SFX F ero     eram            ero      
SFX F ero     eramque         ero      
SFX F ero     eramqve         ero      
SFX F ero     eramne          ero      
SFX F ero     eramve          ero      
SFX F ero     eramue          ero        
SFX F ero     eras            ero      
SFX F ero     erasque         ero      
SFX F ero     erasqve         ero      
SFX F ero     erasne          ero      
SFX F ero     erasve          ero      
SFX F ero     erasue          ero        
SFX F ero     erat            ero      
SFX F ero     eratque         ero      
SFX F ero     eratqve         ero      
SFX F ero     eratne          ero      
SFX F ero     eratve          ero      
SFX F ero     eratue          ero        
SFX F ero     eramus          ero      
SFX F ero     eramvs          ero      
SFX F ero     eramusque       ero      
SFX F ero     eramvsqve       ero      
SFX F ero     eramusne        ero      
SFX F ero     eramvsne        ero      
SFX F ero     eramusve        ero      
SFX F ero     eramusue        ero        
SFX F ero     eramvsve        ero      
SFX F ero     eratis          ero      
SFX F ero     eratisque       ero      
SFX F ero     eratisqve       ero      
SFX F ero     eratisne        ero      
SFX F ero     eratisve        ero      
SFX F ero     eratisue        ero        
SFX F ero     erant           ero      
SFX F ero     erantque        ero      
SFX F ero     erantqve        ero      
SFX F ero     erantne         ero      
SFX F ero     erantve         ero      
SFX F ero     erantue         ero        
SFX F ero     erar            ero      
SFX F ero     erarque         ero      
SFX F ero     erarqve         ero      
SFX F ero     erarne          ero      
SFX F ero     erarve          ero      
SFX F ero     erarue          ero        
SFX F ero     eraris          ero      
SFX F ero     erarisque       ero      
SFX F ero     erarisqve       ero      
SFX F ero     erarisne        ero      
SFX F ero     erarisve        ero      
SFX F ero     erarisue        ero        
SFX F ero     eratur          ero      
SFX F ero     eratvr          ero      
SFX F ero     eraturque       ero      
SFX F ero     eratvrqve       ero      
SFX F ero     eraturne        ero      
SFX F ero     eratvrne        ero      
SFX F ero     eraturve        ero      
SFX F ero     eraturue        ero        
SFX F ero     eratvrve        ero      
SFX F ero     eramur          ero      
SFX F ero     eramvr          ero      
SFX F ero     eramurque       ero      
SFX F ero     eramvrqve       ero      
SFX F ero     eramurne        ero      
SFX F ero     eramvrne        ero      
SFX F ero     eramurve        ero      
SFX F ero     eramurue        ero        
SFX F ero     eramvrve        ero      
SFX F ero     eramini         ero      
SFX F ero     eraminique      ero      
SFX F ero     eraminiqve      ero      
SFX F ero     eraminine       ero      
SFX F ero     eraminive       ero      
SFX F ero     eraminiue       ero        
SFX F ero     erantur         ero      
SFX F ero     erantvr         ero      
SFX F ero     eranturque      ero      
SFX F ero     erantvrqve      ero      
SFX F ero     eranturne       ero      
SFX F ero     erantvrne       ero      
SFX F ero     eranturve       ero      
SFX F ero     eranturue       ero        
SFX F ero     erantvrve       ero      
SFX F ero     erebam          ero      
SFX F ero     erebamque       ero      
SFX F ero     erebamqve       ero      
SFX F ero     erebamne        ero      
SFX F ero     erebamve        ero      
SFX F ero     erebamue        ero        
SFX F ero     erebas          ero      
SFX F ero     erebasque       ero      
SFX F ero     erebasqve       ero      
SFX F ero     erebasne        ero      
SFX F ero     erebasve        ero      
SFX F ero     erebasue        ero        
SFX F ero     erebat          ero      
SFX F ero     erebatque       ero      
SFX F ero     erebatqve       ero      
SFX F ero     erebatne        ero      
SFX F ero     erebatve        ero      
SFX F ero     erebatue        ero        
SFX F ero     erebamus        ero      
SFX F ero     erebamvs        ero      
SFX F ero     erebamusque     ero      
SFX F ero     erebamvs        ero      
SFX F ero     erebamusne      ero      
SFX F ero     erebamvsne      ero      
SFX F ero     erebamusve      ero      
SFX F ero     erebamusue      ero        
SFX F ero     erebamvsve      ero      
