fixer/src/main/resources/la/la/universal/la.dic
adfero/F
affero/F
antefero/F
aufero/F
abfero/F
circumaufero/F
circumfero/F
circunfero/F
confero/F
defero/F
differo/F
ecfero/F
effero/F
Fidis/F
infero/F
introfero/F
obfero/F
offero/F
perfero/F
postfero/F
praefero/F
praeterfero/F
profero/F
refero/F
subfero/F
subinfero/F
suffero/F
superfero/F
transfero/F
avfero/F
circvmavfero/F
circvmfero/F
circvnfero/F
svbfero/F
svbinfero/F
svffero/F
svperfero/F
